Mississippi, session 2026, HB4122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Cleveland Stallworth of Jackson County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction on May 30, 1975, in George County for the crime of Robbery, for which he was sentenced to ten (10) years, sentenced on June 22, 1978, in Jackson County for the crime of Possession of a Controlled Substance to serve three (3) years concurrent with the previous ten (10) year sentence. On March 13, 1980, he was convicted of aggravated assault in Harrison County for which he was sentenced to three (3) years on supervised probation, and convicted of Burglary business for which he was sentenced to six (6) years probation running consecutive; and he was released on April 7, 1987. On March 2, 2004, he was convicted for Possession of a Weapon by a convicted felon in Jackson County, and sentenced to serve three (3) years, followed by two (2) years supervised probation; and discharged on December 28, 2005.  On February 8, 2013, he was convicted of Grand Larceny in Jackson County for which he was sentenced to serve five (5) years with five (5) years supervised probation.  He was released on parole and discharged on October 23, 2015. The Legislature is informed that he has conducted himself as a law-abiding citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.